apertium-frp.frp.metadix
<pardef n="apond/re__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ua</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ues</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ons</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éd</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ont</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ê</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ês</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>êt</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ans</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>âd</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>évo</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éves</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éve</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>évens</l>     <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>évons</l>     <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>évâd</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>évont</l>     <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ré</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rés</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rat</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rens</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rons</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>réd</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ront</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>rê</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rên</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rês</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rêt</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rans</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rians</l>     <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>râd</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>riâd</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rant</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>riant</l>     <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ons</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éd</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ont</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esso</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esses</l>     <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esse</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>essens</l>    <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>essons</l>    <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esséd</l>     <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>essont</l>    <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy2"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_cons"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ons</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ons</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_cons"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éd</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éd</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éds</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy2"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy1"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__enc_voy2"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ro/ntre__vblex">
  <e>       <i>nt</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>          <r>ntre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ts</l>         <r>ntre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ta</l>         <r>ntre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tes</l>        <r>ntre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="apendre">         <i>apend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="apondre">         <i>apond</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rompre">          <i>romp</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="corrompre">          <i>corromp</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="entèrrompre" a="LoTrèsor"><i>entèrromp</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rontre">          <i>ro</i><par n="ro/ntre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dèrontre">        <i>dèro</i><par n="ro/ntre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atendre">         <i>atend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="confondre">       <i>confond</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="corrèspondre">    <i>corrèspond</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dèfendre">        <i>dèfend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dèpendre">        <i>dèpend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dèpondre">        <i>dèpond</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dètendre">        <i>dètend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dètiendre">       <i>dètiend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="entendre">        <i>entend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fendre">          <i>fend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fondre">          <i>fond</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pendre">          <i>pend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prètendre">       <i>prètend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rapondre">        <i>rapond</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="recondre">        <i>recond</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="refendre">        <i>refend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rèpondre">        <i>rèpond</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="suspendre">       <i>suspend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tendre">          <i>tend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tiendre">         <i>tiend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vendre">          <i>vend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ècondre">         <i>ècond</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ètendre">         <i>ètend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ètiendre">        <i>ètiend</i><par n="apond/re__vblex"/></e>
